Ohio, session 136, HB460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 2923.126 of the Revised Code be 7
amended to read as follows: 8
Sec. 2923.126. (A) A concealed handgun license that is 9
issued under section 2923.125 of the Revised Code shall expire 10
five years after the date of issuance. A licensee who has been 11
issued a license under that section shall be granted a grace 12
period of thirty days after the licensee's license expires 13
during which the licensee's license remains valid. Except as 14
provided in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, a licensee 15
who has been issued a concealed handgun license under section 16
2923.125 or 2923.1213 of the Revised Code may carry a concealed 17
handgun anywhere in this state if the license is valid when the 18
licensee is in actual possession of a concealed handgun. The 19
licensee shall give notice of any change in the licensee's 20
residence address to the sheriff who issued the license within 21

H. B. No. 460 Page 2
As Introduced
forty-five days after that change. 22
(B) A valid concealed handgun license does not authorize 23
the licensee to carry a concealed handgun in any manner 24
prohibited under division (B) of section 2923.12 of the Revised 25
Code or in any manner prohibited under section 2923.16 of the 26
Revised Code. A valid license does not authorize the licensee to 27
carry a concealed handgun into any of the following places: 28
(1) A police station, sheriff's office, or state highway 29
patrol station, premises controlled by the bureau of criminal 30
identification and investigation; a state correctional 31
institution, jail, workhouse, or other detention facility; any 32
area of an airport passenger terminal that is beyond a passenger 33
or property screening checkpoint or to which access is 34
restricted through security measures by the airport authority or 35
a public agency; or an institution that is maintained, operated, 36
managed, and governed pursuant to division (A) of section 37
5119.14 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1) of section 38
5123.03 of the Revised Code; 39
(2) A school safety zone if the licensee's carrying the 40
concealed handgun is in violation of section 2923.122 of the 41
Revised Code; 42
(3) A courthouse or another building or structure in which 43
a courtroom is located if the licensee's carrying the concealed 44
handgun is in violation of section 2923.123 of the Revised Code; 45
(4) Any premises or open air arena for which a D permit 46
has been issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code if the 47
licensee's carrying the concealed handgun is in violation of 48
section 2923.121 of the Revised Code; 49
(5) Any premises owned or leased by any public or private 50

H. B. No. 460 Page 3
As Introduced
college, university, or other institution of higher education, 51
unless the handgun is in a locked motor vehicle or the licensee 52
is in the immediate process of placing the handgun in a locked 53
motor vehicle or unless the licensee is carrying the concealed 54
handgun pursuant to a written policy, rule, or other 55
authorization that is adopted by the institution's board of 56
trustees or other governing body and that authorizes specific 57
individuals or classes of individuals to carry a concealed 58
handgun on the premises; 59
(6) Any church, synagogue, mosque, or other place of 60
worship, unless the church, synagogue, mosque, or other place of 61
worship posts or permits otherwise; 62
(7) Any building that is a government facility of this 63
state or a political subdivision of this state and that is not a 64
building that is used primarily as a shelter, restroom, parking 65
facility for motor vehicles, or rest facility and is not a 66
courthouse or other building or structure in which a courtroom 67
is located that is subject to division (B)(3) of this section, 68
unless the either of the following applies: 69
(a) The governing body with authority over the building 70
has enacted a statute, ordinance, or policy that permits a 71
licensee to carry a concealed handgun into the building; 72
(b) All of the following apply: 73
(i) The licensee is a person who has been issued a valid 74
concealed handgun license under section 2923.125 or 2923.1213 of 75
the Revised Code and not a person deemed to have been issued a 76
valid concealed handgun license under section 2923.111 of the 77
Revised Code. 78
(ii) The licensee is a member of the general assembly, 79

H. B. No. 460 Page 4
As Introduced
statewide elected official, judge, or magistrate and when 80
carrying a concealed handgun under authority of this division is 81
carrying validating identification and a valid concealed handgun 82
license. 83
(8) A place in which federal law prohibits the carrying of 84
handguns. 85
(C)(1) Nothing in this section shall negate or restrict a 86
rule, policy, or practice of a private employer that is not a 87
private college, university, or other institution of higher 88
education concerning or prohibiting the presence of firearms on 89
the private employer's premises or property, including motor 90
vehicles owned by the private employer. Nothing in this section 91
shall require a private employer of that nature to adopt a rule, 92
policy, or practice concerning or prohibiting the presence of 93
firearms on the private employer's premises or property, 94
including motor vehicles owned by the private employer. 95
(2)(a) A private employer shall be immune from liability 96
in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or 97
property that allegedly was caused by or related to a licensee 98
bringing a handgun onto the premises or property of the private 99
employer, including motor vehicles owned by the private 100
employer, unless the private employer acted with malicious 101
purpose. A private employer is immune from liability in a civil 102
action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that 103
allegedly was caused by or related to the private employer's 104
decision to permit a licensee to bring, or prohibit a licensee 105
from bringing, a handgun onto the premises or property of the 106
private employer. 107
(b) A political subdivision shall be immune from liability 108
in a civil action, to the extent and in the manner provided in 109

H. B. No. 460 Page 5
As Introduced
Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code, for any injury, death, or 110
loss to person or property that allegedly was caused by or 111
related to a licensee bringing a handgun onto any premises or 112
property owned, leased, or otherwise under the control of the 113
political subdivision. As used in this division, "political 114
subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 2744.01 of the 115
Revised Code. 116
(c) An institution of higher education shall be immune 117
from liability in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss 118
to person or property that allegedly was caused by or related to 119
a licensee bringing a handgun onto the premises of the 120
institution, including motor vehicles owned by the institution, 121
unless the institution acted with malicious purpose. An 122
institution of higher education is immune from liability in a 123
civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or 124
property that allegedly was caused by or related to the 125
institution's decision to permit a licensee or class of 126
licensees to bring a handgun onto the premises of the 127
institution. 128
(d) A nonprofit corporation shall be immune from liability 129
in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or 130
property that allegedly was caused by or related to a licensee 131
bringing a handgun onto the premises of the nonprofit 132
corporation, including any motor vehicle owned by the nonprofit 133
corporation, or to any event organized by the nonprofit 134
corporation, unless the nonprofit corporation acted with 135
malicious purpose. A nonprofit corporation is immune from 136
liability in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to 137
person or property that allegedly was caused by or related to 138
the nonprofit corporation's decision to permit a licensee to 139
bring a handgun onto the premises of the nonprofit corporation 140

H. B. No. 460 Page 6
As Introduced
or to any event organized by the nonprofit corporation. The 141
immunities described in this division apply to an entity that 142
leases its property to the nonprofit corporation or permits its 143
property to be used by the nonprofit corporation for any 144
purpose. 145
(3)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(3)(b) of this 146
section and section 2923.1214 of the Revised Code, the owner or 147
person in control of private land or premises, and a private 148
person or entity leasing land or premises owned by the state, 149
the United States, or a political subdivision of the state or 150
the United States, may post a sign in a conspicuous location on 151
that land or on those premises prohibiting persons from carrying 152
firearms or concealed firearms on or onto that land or those 153
premises. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a 154
person who knowingly violates a posted prohibition of that 155
nature is guilty of criminal trespass in violation of division 156
(A)(4) of section 2911.21 of the Revised Code and is guilty of a 157
misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If a person knowingly violates 158
a posted prohibition of that nature and the posted land or 159
premises primarily was a parking lot or other parking facility, 160
the person is not guilty of criminal trespass under section 161
2911.21 of the Revised Code or under any other criminal law of 162
this state or criminal law, ordinance, or resolution of a 163
political subdivision of this state, and instead is subject only 164
to a civil cause of action for trespass based on the violation. 165
If a person knowingly violates a posted prohibition of the 166
nature described in this division and the posted land or 167
premises is a child care center, type A family child care home, 168
or type B family child care home, unless the person is a 169
licensee who resides in a type A family child care home or type 170
B family child care home, the person is guilty of aggravated 171

H. B. No. 460 Page 7
As Introduced
trespass in violation of section 2911.211 of the Revised Code. 172
Except as otherwise provided in this division, the offender is 173
guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the person 174
previously has been convicted of a violation of this division or 175
of any offense of violence, if the weapon involved is a firearm 176
that is either loaded or for which the offender has ammunition 177
ready at hand, or if the weapon involved is dangerous ordnance, 178
the offender is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. 179
(b) A landlord may not prohibit or restrict a tenant who 180
is a licensee and who on or after September 9, 2008, enters into 181
a rental agreement with the landlord for the use of residential 182
premises, and the tenant's guest while the tenant is present, 183
from lawfully carrying or possessing a handgun on those 184
residential premises. 185
(c) As used in division (C)(3) of this section: 186
(i) "Residential premises" has the same meaning as in 187
section 5321.01 of the Revised Code, except "residential 188
premises" does not include a dwelling unit that is owned or 189
operated by a college or university. 190
(ii) "Landlord," "tenant," and "rental agreement" have the 191
same meanings as in section 5321.01 of the Revised Code. 192
(D) A person who holds a valid concealed handgun license 193
issued by another state that is recognized by the attorney 194
general pursuant to a reciprocity agreement entered into 195
pursuant to section 109.69 of the Revised Code or a person who 196
holds a valid concealed handgun license under the circumstances 197
described in division (B) of section 109.69 of the Revised Code 198
has the same right to carry a concealed handgun in this state as 199
a person who was issued a concealed handgun license under 200

H. B. No. 460 Page 8
As Introduced
section 2923.125 of the Revised Code and is subject to the same 201
restrictions that apply to a person who has been issued a 202
license under that section that is valid at the time in 203
question. 204
(E)(1) A peace officer has the same right to carry a 205
concealed handgun in this state as a person who was issued a 206
concealed handgun license under section 2923.125 of the Revised 207
Code, provided that the officer when carrying a concealed 208
handgun under authority of this division is carrying validating 209
identification. For purposes of reciprocity with other states, a 210
peace officer shall be considered to be a licensee in this 211
state. 212
(2) An active duty member of the armed forces of the 213
United States who is carrying a valid military identification 214
card and documentation of successful completion of firearms 215
training that meets or exceeds the training requirements 216
described in division (G)(1) of section 2923.125 of the Revised 217
Code has the same right to carry a concealed handgun in this 218
state as a person who was issued a concealed handgun license 219
under section 2923.125 of the Revised Code and is subject to the 220
same restrictions as specified in this section. 221
(3) A tactical medical professional who is qualified to 222
carry firearms while on duty under section 109.771 of the 223
Revised Code has the same right to carry a concealed handgun in 224
this state as a person who was issued a concealed handgun 225
license under section 2923.125 of the Revised Code. 226
(4) A fire investigator who is qualified to carry firearms 227
while on duty under section 109.774 of the Revised Code has the 228
same right to carry a concealed handgun in this state as a 229
person who was issued a concealed handgun license under section 230

H. B. No. 460 Page 9
As Introduced
2923.125 of the Revised Code. 231
(F)(1) A qualified retired peace officer who possesses a 232
retired peace officer identification card issued pursuant to 233
division (F)(2) of this section and a valid firearms 234
requalification certification issued pursuant to division (F)(3) 235
of this section has the same right to carry a concealed handgun 236
in this state as a person who was issued a concealed handgun 237
license under section 2923.125 of the Revised Code and is 238
subject to the same restrictions that apply to a person who has 239
been issued a license issued under that section that is valid at 240
the time in question. For purposes of reciprocity with other 241
states, a qualified retired peace officer who possesses a 242
retired peace officer identification card issued pursuant to 243
division (F)(2) of this section and a valid firearms 244
requalification certification issued pursuant to division (F)(3) 245
of this section shall be considered to be a licensee in this 246
state. 247
(2)(a) Each public agency of this state or of a political 248
subdivision of this state that is served by one or more peace 249
officers shall issue a retired peace officer identification card 250
to any person who retired from service as a peace officer with 251
that agency, if the issuance is in accordance with the agency's 252
policies and procedures and if the person, with respect to the 253
person's service with that agency, satisfies all of the 254
following: 255
(i) The person retired in good standing from service as a 256
peace officer with the public agency, and the retirement was not 257
for reasons of mental instability. 258
(ii) Before retiring from service as a peace officer with 259
that agency, the person was authorized to engage in or supervise 260

H. B. No. 460 Page 10
As Introduced
the prevention, detection, investigation, or prosecution of, or 261
the incarceration of any person for, any violation of law and 262
the person had statutory powers of arrest. 263
(iii) At the time of the person's retirement as a peace 264
officer with that agency, the person was trained and qualified 265
to carry firearms in the performance of the peace officer's 266
duties. 267
(iv) Before retiring from service as a peace officer with 268
that agency, the person was regularly employed as a peace 269
officer for an aggregate of fifteen years or more, or, in the 270
alternative, the person retired from service as a peace officer 271
with that agency, after completing any applicable probationary 272
period of that service, due to a service-connected disability, 273
as determined by the agency. 274
(b) A retired peace officer identification card issued to 275
a person under division (F)(2)(a) of this section shall identify 276
the person by name, contain a photograph of the person, identify 277
the public agency of this state or of the political subdivision 278
of this state from which the person retired as a peace officer 279
and that is issuing the identification card, and specify that 280
the person retired in good standing from service as a peace 281
officer with the issuing public agency and satisfies the 282
criteria set forth in divisions (F)(2)(a)(i) to (iv) of this 283
section. In addition to the required content specified in this 284
division, a retired peace officer identification card issued to 285
a person under division (F)(2)(a) of this section may include 286
the firearms requalification certification described in division 287
(F)(3) of this section, and if the identification card includes 288
that certification, the identification card shall serve as the 289
firearms requalification certification for the retired peace 290

H. B. No. 460 Page 11
As Introduced
officer. If the issuing public agency issues credentials to 291
active law enforcement officers who serve the agency, the agency 292
may comply with division (F)(2)(a) of this section by issuing 293
the same credentials to persons who retired from service as a 294
peace officer with the agency and who satisfy the criteria set 295
forth in divisions (F)(2)(a)(i) to (iv) of this section, 296
provided that the credentials so issued to retired peace 297
officers are stamped with the word "RETIRED." 298
(c) A public agency of this state or of a political 299
subdivision of this state may charge persons who retired from 300
service as a peace officer with the agency a reasonable fee for 301
issuing to the person a retired peace officer identification 302
card pursuant to division (F)(2)(a) of this section. 303
(3) If a person retired from service as a peace officer 304
with a public agency of this state or of a political subdivision 305
of this state and the person satisfies the criteria set forth in 306
divisions (F)(2)(a)(i) to (iv) of this section, the public 307
agency may provide the retired peace officer with the 308
opportunity to attend a firearms requalification program that is 309
approved for purposes of firearms requalification required under 310
section 109.801 of the Revised Code. The retired peace officer 311
may be required to pay the cost of the course. 312
If a retired peace officer who satisfies the criteria set 313
forth in divisions (F)(2)(a)(i) to (iv) of this section attends 314
a firearms requalification program that is approved for purposes 315
of firearms requalification required under section 109.801 of 316
the Revised Code, the retired peace officer's successful 317
completion of the firearms requalification program requalifies 318
the retired peace officer for purposes of division (F) of this 319
section for five years from the date on which the program was 320

H. B. No. 460 Page 12
As Introduced
successfully completed, and the requalification is valid during 321
that five-year period. If a retired peace officer who satisfies 322
the criteria set forth in divisions (F)(2)(a)(i) to (iv) of this 323
section satisfactorily completes such a firearms requalification 324
program, the retired peace officer shall be issued a firearms 325
requalification certification that identifies the retired peace 326
officer by name, identifies the entity that taught the program, 327
specifies that the retired peace officer successfully completed 328
the program, specifies the date on which the course was 329
successfully completed, and specifies that the requalification 330
is valid for five years from that date of successful completion. 331
The firearms requalification certification for a retired peace 332
officer may be included in the retired peace officer 333
identification card issued to the retired peace officer under 334
division (F)(2) of this section. 335
A retired peace officer who attends a firearms 336
requalification program that is approved for purposes of 337
firearms requalification required under section 109.801 of the 338
Revised Code may be required to pay the cost of the program. 339
(G) As used in this section: 340
(1) "Qualified retired peace officer" means a person who 341
satisfies all of the following: 342
(a) The person satisfies the criteria set forth in 343
divisions (F)(2)(a)(i) to (v)(iv) of this section. 344
(b) The person is not under the influence of alcohol or 345
another intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance. 346
(c) The person is not prohibited by federal law from 347
receiving firearms. 348
(2) "Retired peace officer identification card" means an 349

H. B. No. 460 Page 13
As Introduced
identification card that is issued pursuant to division (F)(2) 350
of this section to a person who is a retired peace officer. 351
(3) "Government facility of this state or a political 352
subdivision of this state" means any of the following: 353
(a) A building or part of a building that is owned or 354
leased by the government of this state or a political 355
subdivision of this state and where employees of the government 356
of this state or the political subdivision regularly are present 357
for the purpose of performing their official duties as employees 358
of the state or political subdivision; 359
(b) The office of a deputy registrar serving pursuant to 360
Chapter 4503. of the Revised Code that is used to perform deputy 361
registrar functions. 362
(4) "Governing body" has the same meaning as in section 363
154.01 of the Revised Code. 364
(5) "Tactical medical professional" has the same meaning 365
as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code. 366
(6) "Validating identification" means photographic one of 367
the following: 368
(a) Photographic identification issued by the agency for 369
which an individual serves as a peace officer that identifies 370
the individual as a peace officer of the agency; 371
(b) Photographic identification issued by the facility in 372
which the individual serves in the individual's capacity as a 373
member of the general assembly, a statewide elected official, 374
judge, or magistrate that identifies the individual as a member 375
of the general assembly, a statewide elected official, judge, or 376
magistrate. 377

H. B. No. 460 Page 14
As Introduced
(7) "Nonprofit corporation" means any private organization 378
that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to 379
subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c) of the 380
Internal Revenue Code. 381
(8) "Fire investigator" has the same meaning as in section 382
109.71 of the Revised Code. 383
Section 2. That existing section 2923.126 of the Revised 384
Code is hereby repealed. 385
Section 3. Section 2923.126 of the Revised Code is 386
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 387
by H.B. 33, H.B. 452, and S.B. 98 all of the 135th General 388
Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in 389
division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments 390
are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous 391
operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of 392
the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section 393
as presented in this act. 394